Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.264

Unlawful manufacture of telecommunication device.

(1) A person is guilty of unlawful manufacture of a telecommunication device if he or she knowingly and with intent to avoid payment or to facilitate avoidance of payment:

(a) Manufactures, produces, or assembles a telecommunication device;

(b) Modifies, alters, programs, or reprograms a telecommunication device to be capable of acquiring or of facilitating the acquisition of telecommunication service without the consent of the telecommunication service provider; or

(c) Writes, creates, or modifies a computer program that he or she knows is thereby capable of being used to manufacture a telecommunication device.

(2) Unlawful manufacture of a telecommunication device is a class C felony.

[ 1995 c 92 s 7.]

NOTES:

Telecommunications crime: Chapter 9.26A RCW.